Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 16 Public Works Arbitration

37-16-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Public Works Arbitration Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-2.
Contract provision for arbitration.

A provision in a written contract executed on or after January 1, 1962, for the construction, alteration, repair, or painting of any public building, sewer, highway, bridge, water treatment or disposal projects one party to which is the state, a city, a town, or an authority, a board, a public corporation, or any similar body created by statute or ordinance or any committee, agency, or subdivision of any of them, to settle by arbitration any dispute or claim arising out of or concerning the performance or interpretation of the contract shall be valid, irrevocable, and enforceable, save upon grounds existing in law or equity for the revocation of the contract.

Every contract for the construction, alteration, repair, painting, or demolition of any public building, sewer, water treatment or disposal project, highway, or bridge one party to which is the state, a city, a town, or an authority, a board, a public corporation, or any similar body created by statute or ordinance or any committee, agency, or subdivision of any of them which has a contract price of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more and which is executed on or after July 1, 1967, shall contain a provision for arbitration of disputes and claims arising out of or concerning the performance or interpretation of the contract as follows:

“All claims, disputes, and other matters in question arising out of or relating to this contract or the performance or interpretation thereof shall be submitted to arbitration. Arbitration shall be commenced by a demand in writing made by one party to the contract upon the other within a reasonable time after the dispute, claim, or other matter in question arose but in no event after payment in full of the contract price has been made and accepted. The written demand shall contain a statement of the question to be arbitrated and a detailed statement of each item or matter in dispute and the name of the arbitrator appointed by that party. The other party to the contract within ten (10) days of the receipt of the written demand shall appoint an arbitrator and give notice in writing thereof to the party who commenced arbitration. The two (2) arbitrators appointed by the parties shall within ten (10) days of the date of the appointment of the second arbitrator select a third arbitrator who shall be designated as chairperson and who immediately shall give written notice to the parties of his or her appointment. The third arbitrator shall select a time, date, and place for hearing and give each party five (5) days notice in writing thereof. The date for hearing shall not be more than fifteen (15) days after the date of appointment of the third arbitrator. The award shall be made promptly by the arbitrators and, unless otherwise agreed by the parties or specified by law, no later than thirty (30) days from the date of closing the hearing, or, if oral hearings have been waived, from the date of the transmittal of the final statements and proofs to the arbitrators. The award shall be in writing and shall be signed by a majority of the arbitrators. It shall be executed in the manner required by law. The arbitrator shall provide a written explanation of the reasoning for the award. In the event the party of whom arbitration is demanded shall fail to appoint his or her arbitrator within the time specified or the two (2) arbitrators appointed by the parties are unable to agree on an appointment of the third arbitrator within the time specified, either party may petition the presiding justice of the superior court to appoint a single arbitrator who shall hear the parties and make an award as provided herein. The petitioner shall give five (5) days notice in writing to the other party before filing his or her petition.”

Any dispute involving claims less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and associated with construction of a highway or bridge as referred to in subsection (b) shall be submitted to arbitration. Any dispute involving claims of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more and associated with construction of a highway or bridge as referred to in subsection (b) shall only be arbitrated with the consent of the parties. If the parties fail to consent to arbitration and the state of Rhode Island is a party to the dispute, then the claim will proceed in accordance with §

37-13.1-1

.

For the purposes of this section, the term “claims” shall not mean the aggregate amount sought under the contract or in the arbitration, but shall refer specifically to each item or matter in dispute for which additional compensation is sought or for each item for which a credit is sought.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b) of this section, if any contract except for highway and bridge contracts provides for an arbitration procedure, and a method of appointment of an arbitrator or arbitrators, that method shall be followed instead of the method provided in subsection (b) of this section.

This section shall apply to all written contracts executed on or after January 1, 1986.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 377, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 337, § 1.

37-16-3.
Application to subcontracts.

When a contract described in §

37-16-2

is in effect and any party thereto has entered into a subcontract to perform part of the work and/or furnish any materials in connection with the work described in the contract and the terms of the subcontract provide for arbitration of a dispute or claim concerning the performance or interpretation thereof, or the subcontract, expressly or by reference to the terms of the contract, provides that the parties to the subcontract shall comply with the arbitration provisions of the contract, the following shall apply when a request is made or an order of court is entered for arbitration either under the terms of the contract or subcontract.

When arbitration under the contract may adversely affect the interest of a party thereto because of the effect of an award of the arbitrator or arbitrators upon the performance or interpretation of the terms of a subcontract to which he or she is also a party, he or she may require any other party or all other parties to the subcontract to become a party or parties to the arbitration.

When a party to a subcontract makes a demand or an order of court is entered for arbitration under the terms of the subcontract which comply with the provision of this chapter, any party thereto who is also a party to the contract and whose rights under the contract may be adversely affected by the effect of an award of the arbitrator or arbitrators upon the performance or interpretation of the contract may require any other party to the contract to become a party to the arbitration.

When a party to a contract or to a subcontract is made a party to arbitration by virtue of the provisions of this section, he or she shall have all the rights of a party to arbitration as provided in this chapter except the appointment of an arbitrator. Provided, however, he or she may object to the arbitrators appointed by the parties in which event a single arbitrator shall be appointed as provided in §

37-16-2

in the petition of either of the original parties to arbitration. The award of the arbitrator or arbitrators shall be valid and shall be binding on him or her to the extent that it affects the performance or interpretation of the contract and/or subcontract to which he or she is a party. The award of the arbitrator or arbitrators may be enforced, modified, or vacated as this chapter provides an award made in an arbitration of a contract described in §

37-16-2

may be enforced, modified, or vacated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-4.
Stay of legal proceedings pending arbitration.

If any suit or proceedings be brought upon any issue referable to arbitration under contract in writing providing for arbitration, the court in which the suit is pending upon being satisfied that the issue involved in the suit or proceedings is referable to arbitration under the contract, shall on application of one of the parties, stay the trial of the action until arbitration has been held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-5.
Jurisdiction of superior court to enforce arbitration provision and awards.

The entering into a contract in writing providing for arbitration shall be deemed a consent of all parties, including those enumerated in §

37-16-2

, thereto to the jurisdiction of the superior court of this state to enforce the arbitration provision and any award made pursuant to that provision. A party aggrieved by the failure, neglect, or refusal of another to perform under a contract providing for arbitration, may petition the superior court, or a judge thereof, for an order directing that arbitration proceed in the manner provided for in the contract. Five (5) days’ notice in writing of the application shall be served upon the party in default. Service thereof shall be made in the manner specified in the contract, and if no manner specified therein, then in the manner provided by law for personal service of a summons, within or without the state, or substituted service of a summons, or upon satisfactory proof that the party aggrieved has been or will be unable with due diligence to make service in any of the foregoing manners, then notice shall be served in such manner as the court or judge may direct. A judge of the superior court shall hear the parties and upon being satisfied that there is no substantial issue as to the making of the contract or the failure to comply therewith, the court, or the judge thereof, hearing the application, shall make an order directing the parties to proceed to arbitration in accordance with the terms of the contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-6.
Trial upon evidence of substantial issue.

If evidentiary facts are set forth raising a substantial issue as to the making of the contract or the failure to comply therewith, the court, or the judge thereof, shall proceed immediately to the trial of the issues. Whenever an immediate trial is ordered, the order therefor shall provide that, if the court finds that a written contract providing for arbitration was made, and that there was a failure to comply therewith, the parties shall proceed with the arbitration in accordance with the terms of the contract and the order shall provide that if the court finds that there was no contract or failure to comply with the contract, then the proceeding shall be dismissed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 165.

37-16-7.
Method of appointing arbitrators or umpire.

If in the contract providing for arbitration, provision is made for a method of naming or appointing an arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire, that method shall be followed, but if no method be provided therein, then the parties to the contract shall agree to the method of naming or appointing an arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire and if the parties shall fail to agree, then the court or the judge thereof upon application of either of the parties after due notice to the other party shall appoint an arbitrator to hear the dispute.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-8.
Scheduling and notice of arbitration hearing — Adjournment.

Subject to the terms of the contract, if any are specified therein, the arbitrators selected as prescribed in this chapter must appoint a time and place for the hearing of the matters submitted to them, and must cause notice thereof to be given to each of the parties. They, or a majority of them, may adjourn the hearing from time to time upon the application of either party for good cause shown or upon their own motion, but not beyond the day fixed if a date in the contract, if any, for rendering their award, unless the time so fixed is extended by the written consent of the parties to the contract or their attorney, or the parties have continued with the arbitration without objection to adjournment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-9.
Power of court to direct prompt hearing.

The court shall have the power to direct the arbitrators to proceed promptly with the hearing and determination of the dispute, claim, or matter in question.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-10.
Arbitrator’s oath — Waiver.

Before hearing any testimony, arbitrators selected as prescribed in this chapter must be sworn, by an officer authorized by law to administer an oath, faithfully and fairly to hear and examine the claim, dispute, or matter in question and to make a just award according to the best of their understanding, unless the oath is waived by the written consent of the parties to the contract or their attorneys or the parties have continued with the arbitration without objection to the failure of the arbitrators to take the oath.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-11.
Powers of arbitrators.

The arbitrator or arbitrators selected as prescribed in this chapter, may require any person to attend before them as a witness; and he or she and they have, and each of them has, the same powers with respect to all the proceedings before them which are conferred upon a board or a member of a board authorized by law to hear testimony. All the arbitrators selected as prescribed in this chapter must meet together and hear all the allegations and proofs of the parties; but an award by a majority of them is valid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-12.
Fees.

In any proceeding under this chapter, unless the parties agree as to the arbitrator’s or arbitrators’ fees, the fees shall be fixed by the court or the judges thereof who shall require the payment equally by both parties of the arbitrators’ fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-13.
Validity of awards.

An award shall be valid and enforceable according to its terms and under the provisions of this chapter, without previous adjudication of the existence of a contract to arbitrate, subject, nevertheless, to the provisions of this section:

A party who has participated in any of the proceedings before the arbitrator or arbitrators may object to the confirmation of the award only on one or more of the grounds hereinafter specified (provided that he or she did not continue with the arbitration with notice of the facts or defects upon which his or her objection is based) because of a failure to comply with §

37-16-8

or with §

37-16-10

or because of the improper manner of the selection of the arbitrators.

A party who has not participated in any of the proceedings had before the arbitrator or arbitrators and who has not made or been served with an application to compel arbitration under §

37-16-5

may also put in issue the making of the contract or the failure to comply therewith, either by a motion for a stay of the arbitration or in opposition to the confirmation of the award. If a notice shall have been personally served upon that party of an intention to conduct the arbitration pursuant to the provisions of a contract specified in the notice, then the issues specified in this subdivision may be raised only by a motion for a stay of the arbitration, notice of which motion must be served within ten (10) days after the service of the notice of intention to arbitrate. The notice must state in substance that unless within ten (10) days after its service, the party served therewith shall serve a notice of motion to stay the arbitration, he or she shall thereafter be barred from putting in issue the making of the contract or the failure to comply therewith. The arbitration hearing shall be adjourned upon service of the notice pending the determination of the motion. Where the opposing party, either on a motion for a stay or in opposition to the confirmation of an award, sets forth evidentiary facts raising a substantial issue as to the making of the contract or the failure to comply therewith, an immediate trial of the same shall be had. In the event that the party is unsuccessful he or she may, nevertheless, participate in the arbitration if the same is still being carried on.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-14.
Arbitration under chapter deemed special proceeding — Jurisdiction of superior court.

Arbitration of a claim, dispute, or matter in question under a contract described in this chapter shall be deemed a special proceeding of which the superior court for Providence County shall have jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-15.
Procedure for hearing of application to court.

Any application to the court, or a judge thereof, hereunder shall be made and heard in the manner provided by law for the making and hearing of motions, except as otherwise herein expressly provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-16.
Form of award.

To entitle the award to be enforced, as prescribed in this chapter, it must be in writing and within the time limited in the contract, if any, subscribed by the arbitrator or arbitrators making it and either filed in the office of the clerk of the court having jurisdiction as provided in §

37-16-14

or delivered to one of the parties or his or her attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-17.
Court order confirming award.

At any time within one year after the award is made, as prescribed in §

37-16-16

, any party to the contract by the terms of which arbitration was had, may apply to the court having jurisdiction as provided in §

37-16-14

for an order confirming the award. Thereupon the court must grant the order unless the award is vacated, modified, or corrected, as prescribed in §§

37-16-18

and

37-16-19

or unless the award is unenforceable under the provisions of §

37-16-13

. Notice of the motion must be served upon the adverse party or parties or his or her or their attorneys, as prescribed by law for service of notice of a motion upon an attorney in an action in the same court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-18.
Court order vacating award.

In any of the following cases, the court must make an order vacating the award, upon the application of any party to the controversy which was arbitrated.

When the award was procured by fraud.

Where the arbitrator or arbitrators exceeded their powers, or so imperfectly executed them, that a mutual, final, and definite award upon the subject matter submitted was not made.

If there was no valid contract, and the objection has been raised under the conditions set forth in §

37-16-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-19.
Rehearing after vacation of award.

Where an award is vacated, the court in its discretion may direct a rehearing either before the same arbitrator or arbitrators or before a new arbitrator or arbitrators to be chosen in the manner provided in the contract for the selection of the original arbitrator or arbitrators or as provided for in §

37-16-7

and any provision limiting the time in which the arbitrator or arbitrators may make a decision shall be deemed applicable to the new arbitration and shall commence from the date of the court’s order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-20.
Court order modifying or correcting award.

In any of the following cases, the court must make an order modifying or correcting the award, upon the application of any party to the contract by the terms of which the arbitration was held.

Where there was an evident miscalculation of figures or an evident mistake in the description of any persons, thing, or property referred to in the award.

Where the arbitrator or arbitrators have awarded upon a matter not submitted to them, not affecting the merits of the decision upon the matter submitted.

Where the award is imperfect in a matter of form not affecting the merits of the controversy, and, if it had been a master’s report the defect could have been amended or disregarded by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-21.
Notice of motion to vacate, modify, or correct an award.

Notice of a motion to vacate, modify, or correct an award must be served upon all adverse parties, or their attorneys, within sixty (60) days after the award is filed or delivered, as prescribed by law for service of notice of a motion upon an attorney in an action; except that in opposition to a motion to confirm an award, any of the grounds specified in §

37-16-18

may be set up. For the purpose of the motion, any judge who might make an order to stay the proceedings in an action brought in the same court may make an order to be served with the notice of motion staying the proceedings of an adverse party or parties to enforce the award.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 10.

37-16-22.
Entry of judgment — Costs.

Upon the granting of an order confirming, modifying, or correcting an award, judgment may be entered in conformity therewith, except as is otherwise prescribed in this chapter. Costs of the application and of the proceedings subsequent thereto, not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and disbursements, may be awarded by the court in its discretion. If awarded, the amount thereof must be included in the judgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-23.
Filing of papers after judgment.

Immediately after entering judgment, the clerk must attach together and file the following papers:

The contract, and each written extension of the time, if any, within which to make the award.

The award.

Each notice, affidavit, or other paper used upon an application to confirm, modify, or correct the award, and a copy of each order of the court upon the application.

A copy of the judgment.

The judgment may be docketed as if it was rendered in an action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-24.
Effect of judgment.

The judgment so entered has the same force and effect, in all respects as, and is subject to all the provisions of law relating to a judgment in an action. The judgment may be enforced as if it had been rendered in an action in the court in which it is entered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-25.
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from an order made in a proceeding under this chapter, or from a judgment entered upon an award. The proceedings upon the appeal, including the judgment thereupon and the enforcement of the judgment, are governed by the provisions of statute and rule regulating appeal in actions as far as they are applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-26.
Satisfaction of award.

An award which requires the payment of a sum of money by a city, town, the state, or any body described in §

37-16-2

created or organized by or through the authority of any of them, shall be satisfied to the extent of payment of that sum by payment thereof to the party to whom the award was made by the treasurer or officer exercising the duties of a treasurer thereof from its general funds.

An award which requires the payment of a sum of money to a city, a town, or the state or any body described in §

37-16-2

created or organized by or through the authority of any of them shall be satisfied to the extent of payment of that sum by payment thereof to its treasurer or officer exercising the duties of a treasurer thereof who shall deposit the same in its general funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 165, § 1.

37-16-27.
Application to sureties.

If a contractor principal on a bond furnished to guarantee performance or payment on a construction contract and the claimant are parties to a written contract with a provision to submit to arbitration any controversy thereafter arising under the contract, or subject to arbitration as provided in §

37-16-2(b)

, the arbitration provisions shall apply to the surety for all disputes involving questions of the claimant’s right of recovery against the surety. Either the claimant, the contractor principal, or surety may demand arbitration in accordance with the written contract or as provided in §

37-16-2(b)

if applicable in one arbitration proceeding, provided that the provisions of §

37-16-3

shall be applicable to any demand for arbitration. The arbitration award shall decide all controversies subject to arbitration between the claimant, on the one hand, and the contractor principal and surety on the other hand, including all questions involving liability of the contractor principal and surety on the bond, but a claimant must file suit for recovery against the surety within the time limits set forth in §§

37-12-2

and

37-12-5

. The arbitration shall be in accordance with this chapter and the court shall enter judgment thereon as provided therein.

The arbitrator or arbitrators, if more than one, shall make findings of fact as to the compliance with the requirements for recovery against the surety, and those findings of fact shall be a part of the award binding on all parties to the arbitration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 397, § 1.